North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-10.2 Oilseed Industry Promotion [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-10.2-01.
Legislative policy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-03.
North Dakota oilseed council — Membership — Election — Term. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-04.
Sunflower districts — Establishment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-04.1.
Canola districts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-05.
Meetings — Quorum — Compensation and expenses of council. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-06.
Expenditure of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-07.
Council powers and duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-08.
Assessments levied — Continuing appropriation.

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-09.
Nonparticipating growers — Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-10.
Referendum by growers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-11.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-12.
Penalty for nonpayment of assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 61, § 5.

4-10.2-13.
Records of council — Inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.2-14.
Misdemeanor to violate chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 61, § 5.